Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1504
Education Commission of the States; members; selection.

The provisions of Article III, SECTION A., of the Compact for Education notwithstanding, the members of the Education Commission of the States representing this state shall consist of the Governor, three members of the Legislature selected by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, and three members appointed by the Governor. Of the three members appointed by the Governor, one member shall be a member of a school board or board of education of a Class II, III, IV, V, or VI school district or an appointed representative of a state association of school boards or boards of education representing such districts.

Laws 1967, c. 516, § 4, p. 1737;

Laws 1987, LB 199, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2504;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1003.